Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6122HV (1) 91 ms/js H.F. 2614 Section 1. Section 359.43, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. Of the levies authorized under subsections 1 and 2 , the 3 township trustees may credit to a reserve account annually 4 an amount not to exceed thirty cents per thousand dollars of 5 the assessed value of the taxable property in the township for 6 the purchase or replacement of supplies and equipment required 7 to carry out the services specified under section 359.42 , or 8 constructing a fire station . Notwithstanding section 12C.7 , 9 interest earned on moneys credited to the reserve account shall 10 be credited to the reserve account. 11